District of Columbia statutes.
47-1344

Personal property of owner not affecting sale.

The power to sell real property for taxes shall not be affected by personal property of the owner on the real property to be sold.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).